pl.aff
SET ISO8859-2
TRY aioeznrwcysptkmdłuljągbhęśćóżfńźvqxAIOEZNRWCYSPTKMDŁULJĄGBHĘŚĆÓŻFŃŹVQX'

NOSUGGEST !

# ordinal numbers
COMPOUNDMIN 1
# only in compounds: 1th, 2th, 3th
ONLYINCOMPOUND c
# compound rules:
# 1. [0-9]*1[0-9]th (10th, 11th, 12th, 56714th, etc.)
# 2. [0-9]*[02-9](1st|2nd|3rd|[4-9]th) (21st, 22nd, 123rd, 1234th, etc.)
COMPOUNDRULE 2
COMPOUNDRULE n*1t
COMPOUNDRULE n*mp
WORDCHARS 0123456789

FLAG long

PFX b1 Y 1
PFX b1   0         nie       .

SFX a1 Y 6
SFX a1   e         ych       [^i]e
SFX a1   e         ymi       [^i]e
SFX a1   e         ym        [^i]e
SFX a1   e         ch        ie
SFX a1   e         m         ie
SFX a1   e         mi        ie

SFX c1 Y 1
SFX c1   i         u         i
